Tennessee, session 114, HB1808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 7, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The district attorneys general conference may pay the licensing fees for software
applications used by the office of the district attorney general within a judicial district.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1808
010811
- 1 -